Idaho, session 2025, H0360.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-608, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-608. CERTAIN ABORTIONS PERMITTED -- CONDITIONS AND GUIDELINES. (1)
Abortions shall only be lawful if and when performed in a hospital or in a
physician's regular office or a clinic, which office or clinic is properly
staffed and equipped for the performance of such procedures and respect-
ing which the responsible physician or physicians have made satisfactory
arrangements with one (1) or more acute care hospitals within reasonable
proximity thereof providing for the prompt availability of hospital care as
may be required due to complications or emergencies that might arise.
(2) An abortion performed upon a woman who is in the second trimester of
pregnancy shall only be lawful if the same is performed in a hospital.
(3) An abortion performed upon a woman who is in the third trimester of
pregnancy shall only be lawful if the same is performed in a hospital and,
in the judgment of the attending physician, corroborated by a like opinion
of a consulting physician concurring therewith, either is necessary for the
preservation of the life of such woman or, if not performed, such pregnancy
would terminate in birth or delivery of a fetus unable to survive. Third-
trimester abortions undertaken for preservation of the life of a pregnant
patient, as permitted by this subsection, shall, consistent with accepted
medical practice and with the well-being and safety of such patient, be per-
formed in a manner consistent with preservation of any reasonable potential
for survival of a viable fetus.
(4) Nothing in this section shall make legal any abortion that is oth-
erwise illegal under any other law of this state, including section 18-622,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 18-622, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 3. That Section 18-623, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 4. That Section 18-8705, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8705. USE OF PUBLIC FUNDS FOR ABORTION PROHIBITED. (1) No pub-
lic funds made available by the state, a county, a city, a public health
district, a public school district, or any local political subdivision or
agency thereof and distributed by any institution, board, commission, de-
partment, agency, official, or employee of the state, a county, a city, a
public health district, a public school district, or any local political
subdivision or agency thereof shall be used in any way to provide, perform,
or induce an abortion; assist in the provision or performance of an abor-
tion; promote abortion; counsel in favor of abortion; refer for abortion; or
provide facilities for an abortion or for training to provide or perform an
abortion.
(2) No person, agency, organization, or any other party that receives
funds authorized by the state, a county, a city, a public health district, a
public school district, or any local political subdivision or agency thereof
may use those funds to perform or promote abortion, provide counseling in fa-
vor of abortion, make referral for abortion, or provide facilities for abor-
tion or for training to provide or perform abortion.
(3) No fund or committee authorized by Idaho Code for the special pro-
tection of women or children shall be authorized to use or distribute public
funds for payment for abortion, abortion referrals, abortion counseling, or
abortion-related medical or social services.
(4) The provisions of subsections (1), (2), and (3) of this section
shall not apply to:
(a) An abortion performed when the life of the mother is endangered by
a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury, including a
life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the preg-
nancy itself;
(b) A hospital, as defined in section 39-1301, Idaho Code; or
(c) A contract or commercial transaction that is subject to a federal
law related to medicaid.
SECTION 5. That Section 18-8706, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-8706. USE OF SCHOOL TUITION AND FEES FOR ABORTION PROHIBITED. No
part of any tuition or fees paid to a public institution of higher education
shall be used in any way to pay for an abortion, provide or perform an abor-
tion, provide counseling in favor of abortion, make a referral for abortion,
or provide facilities for an abortion or for training to provide or perform
abortion.
SECTION 6. That Section 18-8707, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:


18-8707. ABORTION-RELATED ACTIVITIES PROHIBITED IN SCHOOL-BASED
HEALTH CLINICS AND SEX EDUCATION CURRICULA. (1) No facility operated at a
public institution of higher education or operated by a public school dis-
trict shall provide any of the following services to any person:
(a) Providing or performing an abortion; or
(b) Counseling in favor of abortion;
(c) Referring for abortion; or
(d) (b) Dispensing a drug classified as emergency contraception by the
food and drug administration (FDA), except in the case of rape as de-
fined in section 18-6101, Idaho Code.
(2) No employee of a public institution of higher education or a public
school, acting within the scope of such person's employment, shall provide
any of the following services to any person:
(a) Providing or performing an abortion; or
(b) Counseling in favor of abortion;
(c) Referring for abortion; or
(d) (b) Dispensing a drug classified as emergency contraception by the
FDA, except in the case of rape as defined in section 18-6101, Idaho
Code.
(3) The state department of education, state board of education, and
other state agencies and local units of administration are prohibited from
using state funds to provide or procure an abortion or distribute drugs clas-
sified as emergency contraception by the FDA, except in the case of rape as
defined in section 18-6101, Idaho Code.
(4) No public school district shall allow any individual or organiza-
tion that is a provider of abortion to furnish any materials or instruction
relating to sex education curricula.
SECTION 7. That Chapter 88, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.